src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Prt2_Obj_noArrows
< 0:л 0:и 0:я "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:я 0:т 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.16@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.21@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.23@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:м "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:м "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.36@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:и 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:и 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.53@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:к "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.56@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.63@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.66@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:е 0:т 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.52@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:и 0:т "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0  0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;



!!!
LEXICON IndicativePrt2_kundams
:%> IndicativePrt2_noArrow ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! DESIDERATIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Desiderative-kadoms
< 0:">" "+Pred":0 "+Des":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.DES@" > Desiderative-noArrow ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:О1 0:к 0:с 0:ы "+Pred":0 "+Des":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.DES@" >  Prt2-noArrow-Sc ;

LEXICON Desiderative-kundams
< 0:">" "+Pred":0 "+Des":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.DES@" > Desiderative-noArrow ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:к 0:с 0:ы "+Pred":0 "+Des":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.DES@" >  Prt2-noArrow-Sc ;

LEXICON Desiderative-noArrow
!Desiderative Preterite II
:Ы2ксэ Prt2-noArrow ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/ке+Dim:Ы2кске Prt2-noArrow ;
+Use/Sub/Dial:Ы2ксы Prt2-noArrow ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Desiderative1_Obj ;

LEXICON Desiderative1_Obj
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:л 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:к 0:с 0:к 0:е 0:л 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:Ы2 0:к 0:с 0:ы 0:л 0:ь 0:с 0:е "+Prt2":0 "@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@" "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! CONJUNCTIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Conjunctive-kadoms
:%>О1 Conjunctive-noArrow ;

LEXICON Conjunctive-noArrow
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Conjunctive-kadoms_Obj ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:е 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:О1 0:л 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:и 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > Derya ;
